Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-205] Changes in plan of operation;
voluntary dissolution or cessation of business. (a) Any change in the
special purpose financial captive insurance company's plan of operation shall
require the prior approval of the commissioner.

(b) Any transaction or series of transactions
shall be subject to the prior approval of the commissioner if the transaction
or series of transactions:

(1) Is undertaken to dissolve a special purpose
financial captive insurance company; or

(2) Results in the termination of all or any part of
a special purpose financial captive insurance company's business; provided that
no prior approval of the commissioner shall be required for any transaction or
series of transactions performed in accordance with a document, contract, or
agreement described in the special purpose financial captive insurance
company's plan of operation and if the commissioner is notified in advance of
the transaction or series of transactions.

(c) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company shall notify the commissioner in advance of any change in the
legal ownership of any security issued by the special purpose financial captive
insurance company. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next